Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
PART 2
CONSUMERS' REMEDIES

5-5-201. Effect of violations on rights of parties.

If a creditor has violated the provisions of this code applying to limitations on the schedule of payments or loan term for supervised loans contained in section 5-2-308 or authority to make supervised loans contained in section 5-2-301, the consumer is not obligated to pay the finance charge and has a right to recover from the person violating this code or from an assignee of that person's rights who undertakes direct collection of payments or enforcement of rights arising from the debt a penalty in an amount determined by the court not in excess of three times the amount of the finance charge. With respect to violations arising from consumer credit transactions made pursuant to revolving credit accounts, no action pursuant to this subsection (1) may be brought more than two years after the violation occurred. With respect to violations arising from other consumer credit transactions, no action pursuant to this subsection (1) may be brought more than one year after the due date of the last scheduled payment of the agreement with respect to which the violation occurred.

A consumer is not obligated to pay a charge in excess of that allowed by this code, and if a consumer has paid an excess charge he or she has a right to a refund. A refund may be made by reducing the consumer's obligation by the amount of the excess charge. If the consumer has paid an amount in excess of the lawful obligation under the agreement, the consumer may recover the excess amount from the person who made the excess charge or from an assignee of that person's rights who undertakes direct collection of payments from or enforcement of rights against consumers arising from the debt.

If a consumer is entitled to a refund and a person liable to the consumer refuses to make a refund within a reasonable time after demand, the consumer may recover from that person a penalty in an amount determined by a court not exceeding the greater of either the amount of the finance charge or ten times the amount of the excess charge. If the creditor has made an excess charge in deliberate violation of or in reckless disregard for this code, the penalty may be recovered even though the creditor has refunded the excess charge. No penalty pursuant to this subsection (3) may be recovered if a court has ordered a similar penalty assessed against the same person in a civil action by the administrator described in section 5-6-114. With respect to excess charges arising from revolving credit accounts, no action pursuant to this subsection (3) may be brought more than two years after the time the excess charge was made. With respect to excess charges arising from other consumer credit transactions, no action pursuant to this subsection (3) may be brought more than one year after the due date of the last scheduled payment of the agreement pursuant to which the charge was made.

Except as otherwise provided, no violation of this code impairs rights on a debt.

If an employer discharges an employee in violation of the provisions prohibiting discharge contained in section 5-5-107, the employee may within ninety days bring a civil action for recovery of wages lost as a result of the violation and for an order requiring the reinstatement of the employee. Damages recoverable shall not exceed lost wages for six weeks.

If the creditor establishes by a preponderance of evidence that a violation is unintentional or the result of a bona fide error, notwithstanding the maintenance of procedures reasonably adopted to avoid the error, no liability is imposed under subsections (1) and (3) of this section, and the validity of the transaction is not affected.

In any case in which it is found that a creditor has violated this code, the court may award reasonable attorney fees incurred by the consumer.

If a creditor repeatedly fails to provide a consumer with a statement of an annual percentage rate or finance charge as and to the extent required by the provisions on disclosure contained in section 5-3-101 of this code and has received written notice from the administrator of such repeated failure, any such subsequent failure by the creditor shall relieve any consumer receiving such defective disclosure from any obligation to pay any finance charge in connection with such consumer credit transaction.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1240, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-5-202, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-5-202. Civil liability for violation of disclosure provisions.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a creditor who, in violation of the provisions on disclosure contained in section 5-3-101, other than the provisions on advertising, fails to disclose information to a person entitled to the information under this code is liable to that person in an amount equal to the sum of:

Twice the amount of the finance charge in connection with the transaction, but the liability pursuant to this paragraph (a) shall be not less than one hundred dollars nor more than one thousand dollars; and

In the case of a successful action to enforce the liability under paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), the costs of the action together with reasonable attorney fees as determined by the court.

A creditor has no liability under this section if, within sixty days after discovering an error and prior to the institution of an action under this section or the receipt of written notice of the error, the creditor notifies the person concerned of the error and makes whatever adjustments in the appropriate account are necessary to assure that the person will not be required to pay a finance charge in excess of the amount or percentage rate actually disclosed.

A creditor may not be held liable in any action brought under this section for a violation of this code if the creditor shows by a preponderance of evidence that the violation was not intentional and resulted from a bona fide error notwithstanding the maintenance of procedures reasonably adapted to avoid the error.

Any action that may be brought under this section against the original creditor in any credit transaction involving a security interest in land may be maintained against any subsequent assignee of the original creditor where the assignee, its subsidiaries, or affiliates were in a continuing business relationship with the original creditor either at the time the credit was extended or at the time of the assignment unless the assignment was involuntary or the assignee shows by a preponderance of evidence that it did not have reasonable grounds to believe that the original creditor was engaged in violations of this code and that it maintained procedures reasonably adapted to apprise it of the existence of the violations.

No action pursuant to this section may be brought more than one year after the date of the occurrence of the violation.

In this section, creditor includes a person who in the ordinary course of business regularly extends or arranges for the extension of credit or offers to arrange for the extension of credit.

No provision of this section or section 5-5-201 imposing any liability shall apply to any act done or omitted in good faith in conformity with any rule, regulation, interpretation, or written response to a person pursuant to a written request on behalf of such identified person by the administrator or the board of governors of the federal reserve system pursuant to the federal "Truth in Lending Act" or federal "Consumer Leasing Act", notwithstanding that, after such act or omission has occurred, such rule, regulation, interpretation, or written response is amended, rescinded, or determined by judicial or other authority to be invalid for any reason.

The multiple failure to disclose to any person any information required under this code to be disclosed in connection with a single account under a revolving credit account, other single consumer credit sale, consumer loan, or other extension of consumer credit shall entitle the person to a single recovery under this section, but continued failure to disclose after recovery has been granted shall give rise to rights to additional recoveries.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1241, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-5-203, as it existed prior to 2000.

Cross references:

For the definitions and federal statutory cites of the "Truth in Lending Act" and the "Consumer Leasing Act", see § 5-1-302.

5-5-203. Consumer's right to rescind certain transactions.

In the case of a consumer credit transaction with respect to which a security interest is retained or acquired in any property that is used as the principal dwelling of the person to whom credit is extended, the consumer shall have the same right to rescind the transaction as provided in the federal "Truth in Lending Act" and regulations thereunder. In order to comply with this code, a creditor shall comply with those provisions on the right of rescission of certain transactions.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1243, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-5-204, as it existed prior to 2000.

Cross references:

For the definition and federal statutory cite of the "Truth in Lending Act", see § 5-1-302.

5-5-204. Interests in land.

For purposes of the provisions on civil liability for violation of the disclosure provisions contained in section 5-5-202 and on a consumer's right to rescind certain transactions contained in section 5-5-203, "consumer credit transaction" includes a transaction primarily secured by an interest in land without regard to the rate of the finance charge if the transaction is otherwise a consumer credit transaction.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1243, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-5-201, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-5-205. Refunds and penalties as set-off to obligation.

Refunds or penalties to which the consumer is entitled pursuant to this part 2 may be set off against the consumer obligation and may be raised as a defense to a suit on the obligation without regard to the time limitations prescribed by said sections.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1243, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-5-205, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-5-206. Civil liability for discrimination.

If a person has failed to comply with section 5-3-210, the person aggrieved by such failure to comply has a right to recover actual damages from such person but in no event less than one hundred dollars for actual and exemplary damages nor more than one thousand dollars for actual and exemplary damages. In the case of a successful action to enforce such right of recovery, the aggrieved person shall recover the costs of the action together with reasonable attorney fees as determined by the court.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1243, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-5-206, as it existed prior to 2000.

Cross references:

For discrimination, see article 34 of title 24.